Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-1212.01
Records retention and disposition schedule; review by State Archivist; approval; review by administrator.

(1) Each records retention and disposition schedule submitted to the administrator shall be reviewed by the State Archivist for purposes of selection of archival and historical material, and all such material shall be identified as such on the schedule. When the State Archivist has determined that all archival and historical material has been properly identified and that no disposition, except by transfer to the State Archives of the Nebraska State Historical Society, has been recommended for such material, the State Archivist shall approve such records retention and disposition schedule and return it to the administrator.

(2) The administrator shall review each records retention and disposition schedule submitted, and if the recommended retention periods and the recommended dispositions satisfy audit requirements and give proper recognition to administrative, legal, and fiscal value of the records listed therein and if the records retention and disposition schedule has been approved by the State Archivist, such records retention and disposition schedule shall be approved by the administrator.

Laws 1976, LB 641, § 4;

Laws 1989, LB 18, § 8.